Utah statutes.
58-37b-4.   Manufacture, distribution or possession of substance unlawful --
Penalty.
It is unlawful for any person to manufacture, distribute, or possess with
intent to distribute, an imitation controlled substance.  Any person who
violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
